Hawaii, session 2025, SB440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to part III, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-A  Future career and technical education teacher scholarship program; established. (a)  There is established the future career and technical education teacher scholarship program to be administered by the department to facilitate the recruitment and retention of career and technical education teachers. (b)  An individual shall be eligible for scholarship consideration if the individual: (1)  Is enrolled at a university of Hawaii campus and qualifies for Hawaii resident tuition under section 304A-402; and (2)  Is enrolled in a state-approved teacher education program at the university of Hawaii. (c)  Scholarship recipients shall obtain a license from the Hawaii teacher standards board pursuant to section 302A-805 and shall teach career and technical education in the Hawaii public school system for at least five years immediately following completion of a state‑approved teacher education program. (d)  If a scholarship recipient fails to complete the state‑approved teacher education program or fails to satisfy the teaching requirement under subsection (c), the scholarship recipient shall repay the scholarship award as follows: (1)  For each year less than the required number of years that a scholarship recipient does not teach career and technical education in the Hawaii public school system, the scholarship recipient shall repay a proportionate percentage of the scholarship funds received; and (2)  The department shall set the terms and conditions for scholarship repayment, including circumstances under which scholarship recipients may be eligible for deferment or forgiveness due to hardship or inability to secure employment. (e)  Moneys repaid by scholarship recipients pursuant to subsection (d) shall be deposited in the future career and technical education teacher scholarship program special fund established under section 302A-B. (f) The board may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement and administer the program. §302A-B  Future career and technical education teacher scholarship program special fund.  (a) There is established the future career and technical education teacher scholarship program special fund, into which shall be deposited legislative appropriations and all moneys received as repayment from scholarship recipients under section 302A-A(d). (b)  The special fund shall be administered and used by the department to provide scholarships for the future career and technical education teacher scholarship program." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the future career and technical education teacher scholarship program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  In codifying the new sections added by section 1 of this Act, the revisor of statutes shall substitute appropriate section numbers for the letters used in designating the new sections in this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.